Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB998.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1509 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1509. Qualifications for school bus driver endorsement.* * *(d) Exemption.--The department may not require an individual who operates a school bus used to transport preprimary, primary or secondary school students to or from public, private or parochial schools or events related to the schools or school-related activities and designed to carry 11 to 15 passengers, including the driver, to obtain a school bus driver endorsement.Section 2. Section 1606(b) of Title 75 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:12345678910111213141516171819 § 1606. Requirement for commercial driver's license.* * *(b) Exemptions.--The following persons are not required to obtain a commercial driver's license in order to drive the commercial motor vehicle specified:* * *(9) A person who operates a school bus used to transport preprimary, primary or secondary school students to or from public, private or parochial schools or events related to the schools or school-related activities and designed to carry 11 to 15 passengers, including the driver.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0998PN1087 - 2 - 12345678910111213